Washington statutes.
RCW 19.142.030

Written contract required.

A contract for the sale of health studio services shall be in writing. A copy of the contract, as well as the rules of the health studio if not stated in the contract, shall be given to the buyer when the buyer signs the contract.

[ 1987 c 317 s 4.]